src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_JÄÄTELÖ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 2ö
!!€ jäätelö: jäätelö+N+Sg+Nom iced cream
!!€ jäätelöjen: jäätelö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ jäätelöiden: jäätelö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ jäätelöitten: jäätelö+N+Pl+Gen
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 2ö non-standard
!!€ jäätelöin: jäätelö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ jäätelöhön: jäätelö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_TUOMIO
!! The words with stem vowel o, u, y, ö preceded by vowels still have no
!! more stem  variation than other cases, but give yet another pattern of 
!! allomorphs for plural partitives and genitives:
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 3o
!!€ tuomio: tuomio+N+Sg+Nom # judgment
!!€ tuomiota: tuomio+N+Sg+Par
!!$ tuomioa: tuomio+N+Sg+Par
!!€ tuomioita: tuomio+N+Pl+Par
!!€ tuomioiden: tuomio+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ tuomioitten: tuomio+N+Pl+Gen
!!$ tuomiojen: tuomio+N+Pl+Gen
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!! There's plenty of imaginable non-standard allomorph forms after long
!! vowels:
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 3o non-standard
!!€ tuomioa: tuomio+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€ tuomioin: tuomio+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ tuomiohon: tuomio+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€ tuomioja: tuomio+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€ tuomiojen: tuomio+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen 
+Use/Rare:0  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ; ! not documented

LEXICON N_HÄIRIÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 3ö
!!€ häiriö: häiriö+N+Sg+Nom # disruption
!!€ häiriötä: häiriö+N+Sg+Par
!!€ häiriöiden: häiriö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ häiriöitten: häiriö+N+Pl+Gen
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 3ö non-standard
!!€ häiriöä: häiriö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€ häiriöin: häiriö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ häiriöhön: häiriö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€ häiriöjä: häiriö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€ häiriöjen: häiriö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen 
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ; ! not documented

LEXICON N_ZOMBIE
!! Similar inflection exists in limited amounts in new loan words that are
!! written as pronounced (thus taking no stem variation but still ending
!! with long vowels with a syllable boundary):
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 3eta
!!€ zombie: zombie+N+Sg+Nom # zombie
!!€ zombieta: zombie+N+Sg+Par
!!€ zombieita: zombie+N+Pl+Par
!!€ zombieiden: zombie+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ zombieitten: zombie+N+Pl+Gen
0    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 3eta non-standard
!!€ zombiea: zombie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€ zombiein: zombie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ zombiehen: zombie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€ zombieja: zombie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€ zombiejen: zombie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen 
+Use/Rare:0  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ; ! not documented

LEXICON N_BERNIE
!! This class includes a set of new proper nouns that get nativised a bit:
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 3etä
!!€ Bernie: Bernie+N+Prop+Sg+Nom # Bernie
!!€ Bernietä: Bernie+N+Prop+Sg+Par
!!€ Bernieitä: Bernie+N+Prop+Pl+Par
!!€ Bernieiden: Bernie+N+Prop+Pl+Gen
!!€ Bernieitten: Bernie+N+Prop+Pl+Gen
0    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0    N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0    N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 3etä non-standard
!!€ Berniea: Bernie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€ Berniein: Bernie+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ Berniehen: Bernie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
!!€ Bernieja: Bernie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Par
!!€ Berniejen: Bernie+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen 
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Use/Rare:0  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN ; ! in NS's intro prose
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ; ! not documented
+Err/Orth:0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ; ! not documented

!! !Optional gradation with illatives
!! In some trisyllabic words ending with quantitative consonant gradation, 
!! the illative form can attach to either strong or weak stem, even in 
!! standard written Finnish. Otherwise words in this class behave like other
!! trisyllabic stems.
LEXICON N_LEPAKKO
!!€gt-norm: Noun 4 kko
!!€ lepakko: lepakko+N+Sg+Nom # bat
!!€ lepakoihin: lepakko+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ lepakkoihin: lepakko+N+Pl+Ill
0:ko      N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:ko      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:ko      N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:o    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:o    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ko      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:o       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 4ko non-standard
!!€ lepakkoin: lepakko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ lepakkohon: lepakko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ko   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON N_YKSIKKÖ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 4 kkö
!!€ yksikkö: yksikkö+N+Sg+Nom # unit
!!€ yksiköihin: yksikkö+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ yksikköihin: yksikkö+N+Pl+Ill
0:kö      N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ö      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN    ;
0:ö      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN    ;
0:kö      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:kö      N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:ö       N_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;
!!€gt-desc: Nouns 4ko non-standard
!!€ yksikköin: yksikkö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€ yksikköhön: yksikkö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill 
+Use/Rare:kö  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:kö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON  N
all% stars% -joukkue+N:all% stars% #-joukkue N_ZOMBIE  ;
amplitudimodulaatio+N:amplitudi#modulaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
astrofyysikko+N:astrofyysik N_LEPAKKO  ;
atariyksikkö+N:atari#yksik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
australiankelpie+N:australian#kelpie N_ZOMBIE  ;
avenue+N:avenue N_ZOMBIE  ;
baritonioboe+N:baritoni#oboe N_ZOMBIE  ;
bordercollie+N:bordercollie N_ZOMBIE  ;
caddie+N:caddie N_ZOMBIE  ;
collie+N:collie N_ZOMBIE  ;
deflaatio+N:deflaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
diskvalifikaatio+N:diskvalifikaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
eliöyhteisö+N:eliö#yhteisö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
eläkesäätiö+N:eläke#säätiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
erie+N:erie N_ZOMBIE  ;
esteetikko+N:esteetik N_LEPAKKO  ;
etelänsailio+N:etelänsailio N_TUOMIO  ;
geordie+N:geordie N_ZOMBIE  ;
hallusinaatio+N:hallusinaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
harhaluuloisuushäiriö+N:harhaluuloisuushäiriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
heinikkö+N:heinik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
hemoptoe+N:hemoptoe N_ZOMBIE  ;
hermoheikko+N:hermo#heik N_LEPAKKO  ;
heräämö+N:heräämö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
hymiö+N:hymiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
imukartio+N:imu#kartio N_TUOMIO  ;
intiaanipäällikkö+N:intiaani#päällik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
istuinlaatikko+N:istuin#laatik N_LEPAKKO  ;
iteraatio+N:iteraatio N_TUOMIO  ;
jesuiittaveljestö+N:jesuiitta#veljestö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
jälki-ilmiö+N:jälki-ilmiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
kaavanimistö+N:kaava#nimistö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
kansliapäällikkö+N:kanslia#päällik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
karsikko+N:karsik N_LEPAKKO  ;
kastraatio+N:kastraatio N_TUOMIO  ;
kehilö+N:kehilö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
kehityshäiriö+N:kehitys#häiriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
kissansilmäilmiö+N:kissan#silmä#ilmiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
kitkerö+N:kitkerö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
klassikko+N:klassik N_LEPAKKO  ;
kombinaatio+N:kombinaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
komppanianpäällikkö+N:komppanian#päällik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
ksenotransplantaatio+N:ksenotransplantaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
kustannusyhtiö+N:kustannus#yhtiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
kuusikko+N:kuusik N_LEPAKKO  ;
kymmenikkö+N:kymmenik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
käyttäjäntunnistusyhteisö+N:käyttäjäntunnistusyhteisö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
lassie+N:lassie N_ZOMBIE  ;
legitimaatio+N:legitimaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
lentomekaanikko+N:lento#mekaanik N_LEPAKKO  ;
lentoyhtiö+N:lento#yhtiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
leväkkö+N:leväk N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
lukuhäiriö+N:luku#häiriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
luostarijärjestö+N:luostari#järjestö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
luottokorttilompakko+N:luotto#kortti#lompak N_LEPAKKO  ;
lääkeaaloe+N:lääke#aaloe N_ZOMBIE  ;
mansikkajäätelö+N:mansikka#jäätelö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
maskulinisaatio+N:maskulinisaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
massayksikkö+N:massa#yksik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
merivakuutusyhtiö+N:meri#vakuutus#yhtiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
mittausteknikko+N:mittaus#teknik N_LEPAKKO  ;
mykiö+N:mykiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
männistö+N:männistö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
mättäikkö+N:mättäik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
oboe+N:oboe N_ZOMBIE  ;
omenahyytelö+N:omena#hyytelö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
opetusministeriö+N:opetus#ministeriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
optikko+N:optik N_LEPAKKO  ;
otoe+N:otoe N_ZOMBIE  ;
ovulaatio+N:ovulaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
painoyksikkö+N:paino#yksik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
pienkiinteistö+N:pien#kiinteistö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
piikkiaaloe+N:piikki#aaloe N_ZOMBIE  ;
pintasolukko+N:pinta#soluk N_LEPAKKO  ;
poliisipäällikkö+N:poliisi#päällik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
puhehäiriö+N:puhe#häiriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
puskurivaltio+N:puskuri#valtio N_TUOMIO  ;
puupökkelö+N:puu#pökkelö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
pyhäkkö+N:pyhäk N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
pykäläviidakko+N:pykälä#viidak N_LEPAKKO  ;
ravintolayleisö+N:ravintola#yleisö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
reggae+N:reggae  N_ZOMBIE ; 
ruotsikko+N:ruotsik N_LEPAKKO  ;
segmentaatio+N:segmentaatio N_TUOMIO  ;
sepelikkö+N:sepelik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
seurausilmiö+N:seuraus#ilmiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
skeptikko+N:skeptik N_LEPAKKO  ;
stadionyleisö+N:stadion#yleisö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
säätiö+N:säätiö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
taktikko+N:taktik N_LEPAKKO  ;
talonpoikaispäällikkö+N:talon#poikais#päällik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
tekniikkalukio+N:tekniikka#lukio N_TUOMIO  ;
tulosyksikkö+N:tulos#yksik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
tyllerö+N:tyllerö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
unihäiriö+N:uni#häiriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
veljestö+N:veljestö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
veloitusyksikkö+N:veloitus#yksik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
vesakko+N:vesak N_LEPAKKO  ;
vetyionikonsentraatio+N:vetyioni#konsentraatio N_TUOMIO  ;
ympyrälieriö+N:ympyrä#lieriö N_HÄIRIÖ  ;
zombie+N:zombie N_ZOMBIE  ;
äänittämö+N:äänittämö N_JÄÄTELÖ  ;
äärikkö+N:äärik N_YKSIKKÖ  ;
